src/fst/stems/content.lexd
LEXICON Stem(4)
: a : : # The letter A in Visayan is pronounced as in Spanish !{a}
: a : : # Ah !{a}
: á -a : # An exclamation of sorrow !{á-a}
: a -á<K> : # Pooh !{a-â}
: a bá : # Ah !{abá}
: a bá<K> : # (B) Oh !{abâ}
: a bá : # (B) The back !{abá}
: a bá -a # Ah !{abá-a, abáa}
: á b-ab : # To eat or bite off a piece: to undermine and carry off !{áb-ab}
: a bád : # (Sp. abad) Abbot !{abád}
: a ba désa # (Sp. abadesa) Abbess !{abadésa}
: a ba díya # (Sp. abadia) Abbey !{abadíya}
: a bá ga # The shoulder !{abága}
: a ba gánhan # One with strong or broad shoulders !{abagánhan}
: á bak : # To follow in quick succession !{ábak}
: a ba ká # (Sp. abaca) The hemp-plant !{abaká}
: a bá k-abák # Dim !{abák-abák}
: a ba kahán # One who has plenty of— !{abakahán}
: a bá kan # A small fish of a reddish colour !{abákan}
: á ban : # To finish !{ában}
: á bang : # To take within range or sweep (of fire !{ábang}
: a báng : # (B) Greediness !{abáng}
: a bá ng-ábang # A tree well known for its beautiful leaves and large pods !{abáng-ábang}
: a bá ng-ábang # (B) To help !{abáng-ábang}
: a ba níko # (Sp. abanico) Fan !{abaníko}
: a bá no # (Sp. habano) A cigar !{abáno}
: a ba nsáda # (Sp. avanzada) Exposed !{abansáda}
: a bá o # An expression of joy !{abáo}
: á bas : # (Sp. haba) A kind of beans !{ábas}
: á bat : # To follow !{ábat}
: a bá t-ábat # Dim !{abát-ábat}
: a bá t-abát # To follow closely without going beyond !{abát-abát}
: a báw : # See abáo !{abáw}
: a báy : # (B) To join !{abáy}
: a bá y-abáy # Dim !{abáy-abáy}
: a bá yan # Liable to fall under a spell by which a benefit is changed into its opposite evil !{abáyan}
: á bdan : # See abúd—​to hem !{ábdan}
: a be lyána # (Sp. avellana) Hazel-nut !{abelyána}
: á bhan : # Paábhi !{ábhan}
: á bi : # For instance !{ábi}
: a bí -ábi # Greetings !{abí-ábi}
: á bi an # Friend !{ábian}
: a bi ár # (Sp. aviar) To provide for a journey !{abiár}
: a bi bár # (Sp. avivar) To urge !{abibár}
: a bi erto # (Sp. abierto) Open !{abierto}
: a bíl : # (Sp. hábil) Capable !{abíl}
: a bí l-abíl # Dim !{abíl-abíl}
: a bí l-abilón # See abíl-abíl id !{abíl-abilón}
: a bi lay # Shawl !{abilay}
: a bi lidád # (Sp. habilidad) Ability !{abilidád}
: á bi og # To move to and fro !{ábiog}
: a bi ogán # A swing !{abiogán}
: a bír : # (Sp. haber) Property !{abír}
: a bír : # (Sp. a ver) Let us see !{abír}
: a bi sár # (Sp. avisar) To advise !{abisár}
: a bí so # (Sp. aviso) Notice !{abíso}
: a bi tsuélas # (Sp. habichuela) French-beans !{abitsuélas}
: á blang : # (B) Width !{áblang}
: á blaw : # (B) Affability !{áblaw}
: a bláy : # (B) Shawl !{abláy}
: a bó<K> : # (B) An exclamation denoting aversion !{abô}
: a bó : # Ash !{abó}
: á bo : # A kind of small fish !{ábo}
: a bó -abo # Dim !{abó-abo}
: a bó -ábo # Dim !{abó-ábo}
: a bó -abóhon # Ash-coloured !{abó-abóhon}
: á bog : # See ábiog !{ábog}
: a bo gádo # (Sp. abogado) Lawyer !{abogádo}
: a bo hán # Fire-place !{abohán}
: a bo hón # Ashy !{abohón}
: a bo kádo # A kind of orange-tree !{abokádo}
: a bo nár # (Sp. abonar) To advance !{abonár}
: á bong : # On the windward side !{ábong}
: a bó ngho # Anger !{abóngho}
: a bó no # (Sp. abono) Manure !{abóno}
: a bo rído # (Sp. aburrido) Worried !{aborído}
: a bó rto # (Sp. abórto) Abortion !{abórto}
: a bóy : # Bent !{abóy}
: a bó y-abóy # (B) Dim !{abóy-abóy}
: a bó yon # (B) Abóyon without prefix is not in use !{abóyon}
: a brá so # (Sp. abrazo) Embrace !{abráso}
: á bri : # (Sp. abrir) To unlock !{ábri}
: a bri gána # (Sp. abrir !{abrigána}
: a brí go # (Sp. abrigo) Shawl !{abrígo}
: a bríl : # (Sp. abril) April !{abríl}
: a bri látas # (Sp. abrir !{abrilátas}
: a bso lbér # (Sp. absolver) To absolve !{absolbér}
: a bso lusyón # (Sp. absolución) Absolution !{absolusyón}
: a bsu élto # (Sp. absuelto) Absolved !{absuélto}
: a bsú rdo # (Sp. absurdo) Absurdity !{absúrdo}
: á btan : # For abután from abút—​to arrive !{ábtan}
: á btik : # Dexterity !{ábtik}
: á bud : # A plant with medicinal properties !{ábud}
: a búd : # (B) Hem !{abúd}
: a bu éla # (Sp. abuela) Grandmother !{abuéla}
: a bu élo # (Sp. abuelo) Grandfather !{abuélo}
: a bú kan # A kind of sea-shell !{abúkan}
: a bú kay # To ruffle !{abúkay}
: a bú nda # (Sp. abundar !{abúnda}
: a bu sár # (Sp. abusar) Misuse !{abusár}
: a bú so # (Sp. abuso) Abuse !{abúso}
: a bút : # To arrive !{abút}
: á but : # To reach !{ábut}
: a bú t-abút # Freq !{abút-abút}
: a bú t-ábut # Freq !{abút-ábut}
: á bwa<K> : # To make or scramble for !{ábwà}
: á byan : # See ábian id !{ábyan}
: a byé rto # See abiérto !{abyérto, ábyog, abyogán}
: á da : # (Sp. háda) Fairy !{áda}
: a dá -áda # To receive in trust !{adá-áda}
: á d-ad : # To cut in thin slices !{ád-ad}
: á d-ad : # To reject food !{ád-ad}
: á d-ad : # To gossip !{ád-ad}
: a d-a dán # A slicer !{ad-adán}
: a dá rna # A singing bird !{adárna}
: á dat : # Acridity !{ádat}
: a de lantádo # (Sp. adelantado) Progressive !{adelantádo}
: a de lantár # (Sp. adelantar) To promote !{adelantár}
: a dé lpa # (Sp. adelfa) The rose-bay !{adélpa}
: a de más # (Sp. ademas) Moreover !{además}
: á dgaw : # A tree !{ádgaw}
: a dí : # Give me !{adí}
: a dí kdik # Dandruff !{adíkdik}
: a di kdikón # Full of dandruff !{adikdikón}
: a díng : # A term of endearment used in addressing that class of effeminates known as “agî”: Deary !{adíng}
: a di óng # A large ship !{adióng}
: a di ós # (Sp. adios) God bless you !{adiós}
: a di syón # (Sp. adicion) Addition !{adisyón}
: á dlaw : # Sun !{ádlaw}
: a dlá w-ádlawadláwádlaw # Daily !{adláw-ádlawadláwádlaw}
: a dlá won # Full daylight after sunrise !{adláwon}
: a dmi nistrasyón # (Sp. administración) Administration !{administrasyón}
: a dó bi # (Sp. adobe) Mud-bricks !{adóbi}
: a dó bo # (Sp. adobo) A dish of meat cut up or sliced and mixed with vinegar and various spices !{adóbo}
: a dó dos # To glide !{adódos}
: a do rasyón # (Sp. adoracion) Adoration !{adorasyón}
: a dó rno # (Sp. adorno) Adornment !{adórno}
: á dtang : # The forehead !{ádtang}
: á dto : # That !{ádto}
: a du ána # (Sp. aduana) Custom-house !{aduána}
: a du dúlay # A large earth-worm !{adudúlay}
: á dyo<K> : # A contr !{ádyò}
: á ga : # Morning !{ága}
: a gá -ága # Every morning !{agá-ága}
: á gad : # To serve !{ágad}
: a gád : # Notwithstanding !{agád}
: a gá d-ágad # Freq !{agád-ágad}
: á g-ag : # To separate !{ág-ag}
: a ga hán # Morning tuba or palm-wine collected from the coconut-palms in the morning !{agahán}
: a gák : # Cock !{agák}
: á gak : # To support !{ágak}
: a gá lon # Lord !{agálon}
: a gám : # To cope with !{agám}
: á ga o # To seize !{ágao}
: á ga o # Prepossessing !{ágao}
: á gap : # To cope with !{ágap}
: a gáp : # To rise early !{agáp}
: a gás : # Petroleum !{agás}
: á gas : # To close !{ágas}
: a gá s-agás # A kind of grasshopper !{agás-agás}
: a gá s-ágas # Dim !{agás-ágas}
: á gaw : # See ágao !{ágaw}
: a gá w-agawón # What is to be or should be snatched from or saved at once !{agáw-agawón}
: á gay : # To trickle !{ágay}
: a gá y-ay # Decomposition !{agáy-ay}
: á gba<K> : # Dumb !{ágbà}
: á gbat : # To follow !{ágbat}
: á gbay : # To put one’s arms on or round another’s shoulder !{ágbay}
: á gbon : # (H) Fine ashes !{ágbon}
: á gboy : # A kind of tree with leaves spotted with green and white !{ágboy}
: á gda : # To invite !{ágda}
: á gday : # Slowness !{ágday}
: a gda yán # Slow !{agdayán}
: á gdom : # A kind of shrub with rather dark leaves !{ágdom}
: a gé u #  !{agéu, ágeu}
: a géw : # See agéu !{agéw, ágew}
: á gho<K> : # A small tree much used for fences !{ághò}
: á ghon : # Compass !{ághon}
: a gí<K> : # Soft !{agî}
: á gi : # Passage !{ági}
: a gí -ági # Passing !{agí-ági}
: a gí -ági<K> # Dim !{agî-ágì}
: a gí -agión # See the foregoing agî-ágì !{agî-agión}
: a gí d-ágid # Similar !{agíd-ágid}
: a gi gísing # The temple !{agigísing}
: a gí his # A kind of small shell-fish !{agíhis}
: á gi la # (Sp. águila) Eagle !{ágila}
: a gí l-agíl # Stunted in growth !{agíl-agíl}
: a gí l-agilón # Stunted !{agíl-agilón}
: a gi náldo # (Sp. aguinaldo) Christmas box !{agináldo}
: a gi pó # A firebrand !{agipó}
: a gí ron # A kind of tall grass with sharp-edged blades !{agíron}
: a gí s-is # The mange !{agís-is}
: a gi s-isón # Mangy !{agis-isón}
: a gí sod # To follow one after another !{agísod}
: á glot : # A harsh sound of creaking or grating !{áglot}
: a gná ya # A kind of vine and its stem used for binding purposes and wickerwork !{agnáya}
: a go góling # The humble-bee or bumble-bee !{agogóling}
: a gó ho # A kind of tree !{agóho}
b á nda : # (Sp. banda) Band !{bánda}
b a ndé ha # (Sp. bandeja) Waiter !{bandéha}
b a nde hádo # (A Philippine derivative from bandéha) !{bandehádo}
b a ndé ra # (Sp. bandera) Banner !{bandéra}
b á ndi : # A kind of candy (sweet) made of unrefined sugar and shreds of coconut meat or peanuts !{bándi}
b á ndi<K> : # A small !{bándì}
b á ndo : # (Sp. bando) Notice !{bándo}
b á ndog : # (B) To stir !{bándog}
b a ndo léro # (Sp. bandolero—​highwayman) Town-crier !{bandoléro}
b a ndu ríya # (Sp. bandurria) Bandurria !{banduríya}
b a ngá<K> : # An earthen water-pot !{bangâ}
b a ngá : # To like !{bangá}
b a ngá<K> : # An idiot !{bangâ}
b á ngag : # To crack !{bángag}
b a ngág : # Cracked !{bangág}
b a ngál : # A handful !{bangál}
b á ngan : # To ambush !{bángan}
b á ng-aw : # To become stale !{báng-aw}
b á ngbang : # To widen by digging !{bángbang}
b á ngdan : # Cause !{bángdan}
b á ngday : # To lie one above or across another in irregular fashion !{bángday}
b á ngga<K> : # The part between the kitchen and house in Philippine houses !{bánggà}
b á ngga<K> : # To ambush !{bánggà}
b á nggad : # to accustom !{bánggad}
b á nggan : # For banogán from banóg—​to swell !{bánggan}
b á nggi<K> : # To break or tear off a branch at its juncture with the main stem or tree !{bánggì}
b a nggi ánay # To quarrel !{banggiánay}
b á nggit : # To disagree !{bánggit}
b á nggos : # To rub rather hard with a stone or the like !{bánggos}
b a ngí<K> : # The other— !{bangî}
b a ngí<K> : # To do a thing with only one hand !{bangî}
b a nngí<K> : # To change from side to side !{banngî, -bángì}
b a ngí<K> : # The fiddler-crab !{bangî, -bangî}
b á ngig : # Quarrelling !{bángig}
b a ngí g-bángig # Dim !{bangíg-bángig}
b á ngil : # To prop !{bángil}
b a ngíl : # A prop or wedge for the operation called “bángil” !{bangíl}
b a ngi líd # Slope !{bangilíd, bangílid}
b a ngi rít # To grin !{bangirít}
b a ngís : # Fierceness !{bangís}
b á ngka : # Satiety !{bángka}
b á ngkag : # Bulky !{bángkag}
b á ngkal : # A kind of tree and its timber of a yellowish colour !{bángkal}
b á ngkat : # A kind of open-work basket used for stowing away table-ware !{bángkat}
b á ngkaw : # A lance !{bángkaw}
b a ngká w-bángkaw # A kind of dragon-fly !{bangkáw-bángkaw}
b á ngkay : # A corpse !{bángkay}
b á ngkil : # Eye-tooth !{bángkil}
b a ngkí lan # Possessing tusks !{bangkílan}
b a ngki líng # A kind of tree with edible fruit !{bangkilíng}
b á ngkit : # To nibble !{bángkit}
b á ngko<K> : # See bánkò !{bángkò, bángko}
b á ngkong : # Curved !{bángkong}
b á nglad : # A kind of shrub !{bánglad}
b á nglid : # A slope !{bánglid}
b á nglo<K> : # The fibre of buri-leaves used for making mats !{bánglò}
b á ngog : # Head !{bángog}
b á ng-og : # Decomposition !{báng-og}
b á ngol : # Very tall !{bángol}
b á ngon : # To rise !{bángon}
b a ngón : # The principal external abdominal blood-vessels !{bangón}
b a ngó n-bángon # A cart-pole !{bangón-bángon}
b á ngot : # To tie !{bángot}
b a ngót : # Any rope or string-like material used for binding or tying !{bangót}
b á ngrus : # A kind of fish growing to about a foot in length and much esteemed as food !{bángrus}
b á ngrus : # To rub !{bángrus}
b á ngtan : # etc !{bángtan}
